Montana, session 2025, SB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 16-11-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-11-111. Cigarette, tobacco products, and moist snuff sales tax -- exemption for sale to
tribal member. (1) (a) (i) A tax on the purchase of cigarettes for consumption, use, or any purpose other than
resale in the regular course of business is imposed and must be precollected by the wholesaler and paid to the
state of Montana.
(ii) The tax is $1.70 on each package containing 20 cigarettes that are intended to be burned.
(iii) The tax is 85 cents on each package containing 20 cigarettes that are intended to be heated
but not burned.
(iv) Whenever packages contain other than 20 cigarettes, there is a tax on each cigarette equal to
1/20 one-twentieth of the tax on a package containing 20 cigarettes.
(b) The tax computed under subsection (1)(a) applies to illegally packaged cigarettes under 16-11-
307.
(2) The tax imposed in subsection (1) does not apply to quota cigarettes.
(3) Subject to the refund or credit provided in subsection (4), the tax must be precollected on all
cigarettes entering a Montana Indian reservation.
(4) Pursuant to the procedure provided in subsection (5), a wholesaler making a sale of cigarettes
to a retailer within the boundaries of a Montana Indian reservation may apply to the department for a refund or
credit for taxes precollected on cigarettes sold by the retailer to a member of the federally recognized Indian
tribe or tribes on whose reservation the sale is made. A wholesaler who does not file a claim within 1 year of the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 98

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 98.1
shipment date forfeits the refund or credit.
(5) The distribution of tax-free cigarettes to a tribal member must be implemented through a
system of preapproved wholesaler shipments. A licensed Montana wholesaler shall contact the department for
approval prior to the shipment of the untaxed cigarettes. The department may authorize sales based on
whether the quota, as established in a cooperative agreement between the department and an Indian tribe or
as set out in this chapter, has been met. If authorized as a tax-exempt sale, the wholesaler, upon providing
proof of order and delivery to a retailer within the boundaries of a Montana Indian reservation selling cigarettes
to members of a federally recognized tribe or tribes of that reservation, must be given a refund or credit. Once
the quota has been filled, the department shall immediately notify all affected wholesalers that further sales on
that reservation must be taxed and that a claim for a refund or credit will not be honored for the remainder of
the quota period. Quota allocations are not transferable between quota periods or between reservations.
(6) The total amount of refunds or credits allowed by the department to all wholesalers claiming the
refund or credit under subsection (4) for any month may not exceed an amount that is equal to the tax due on
the quota allocation. The department shall determine the amount of refunds or credits for each Indian
reservation at the beginning of each fiscal year, using the most recent census data available from the bureau of
Indian affairs or as provided in a cooperative agreement with the tribe or tribes of the Indian reservation.
(7) There must be collected and paid to the state of Montana a tax of 50% of the wholesale price,
to the wholesaler, of all tobacco products other than cigarettes, premium cigars, and moist snuff. The tax on a
premium cigar is the lesser of 50% of the wholesale price or 35 cents a premium cigar. The tax on moist snuff is
85 cents an ounce based upon on the net weight of the package listed by the manufacturer. For packages of
moist snuff that are less than or greater than 1 ounce, the tax must be proportional to the size of the package.
Tobacco products shipped from Montana and destined for retail sale and consumption outside the state are not
subject to this tax.
(8) The tax imposed by subsection (7) must be precollected and paid by a wholesaler to the
department upon sale to a Montana retailer. A wholesaler who fails to report or pay the tax required by this part
must be assessed penalty and interest as provided in 15-1-216.
(9) A retailer who purchases tobacco products for resale on which the tobacco products tax has
not been collected and paid to the department shall comply with all the provisions of this part and the rules
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 98

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 98.1
adopted to implement this part as if it were a wholesaler.
(10) A retailer must shall assume that the tobacco products tax has not been collected and paid to
the department in the absence of a statement on the retailer's invoice or sales slip for the tobacco products that
states that the applicable Montana tobacco products tax is included in the total billing cost."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to cigarettes sold by a wholesaler after
June 30, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 98